Utah statutes.
53-11-121.   False representation as a licensee -- Badge -- Identifying clothing.

(1)  A licensee under this chapter may not wear a uniform, or use a title or identification card other than the one issued under this chapter, or make any statement that would lead a reasonable person to believe the licensee is connected in any way with the federal government or any state or local governmental entity, unless the licensee has received authorization in writing by one of those governmental authorities to do so.

(2) (a)  A licensee may possess, wear, and display a badge of a design approved by the board for use by a licensee.

(b)  The licensee may wear or display the badge under Subsection (2)(a) only if the licensee is also at the same time wearing an article of clothing that conspicuously displays on the chest and back of the article of clothing lettering that clearly identifies the licensee as a bail enforcement or recovery agent.

(3)  A licensee may wear a jacket of a distinctive design or style that bears a printed, embroidered, or otherwise permanently attached symbol, emblem, or insignia that:

(a)  clearly identifies the wearer as a bail enforcement or recovery agent; and

(b)  is approved by the board.

